Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 248 Tobacco

248.005.
Legislative finding and declaration on United States Department of Agriculture’s Tobacco Price Support Program.

The General Assembly finds that the Tobacco Price Support Program administered by the United States Department of Agriculture under 7

U.S.C. sec. 1314

is the best and most efficient means of preserving the economic health of thousands of tobacco farms throughout the United States and throughout Kentucky. Based upon this finding, the General Assembly declares that the Tobacco Task Force shall study methods to support the Tobacco Price Support Program and its continuing role in the economic viability of Kentucky’s small tobacco farmer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 533, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

248.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Grower” means a bona fide producer of tobacco, either by himself or by tenant, sharecropper or hired person;

“Warehouse” means any tobacco warehouse operating as a place of sale for tobacco in this state; and

“Warehouseman” means the owner, operator, manager, lessee or proprietor of a warehouse engaged in selling tobacco or his agents or employees.

History.

42c-4, 42c-10, 4814c-4: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 220.

248.015.
Tobacco boards of trade — Powers.

A tobacco board of trade shall be organized on every market at which tobacco is offered for sale at auction and each board shall have the objects, purposes, and powers to: promote a more orderly market for the sale of tobacco at auction; prevent market gluts by arranging for a more orderly flow of tobacco through the warehouses; encourage ethical practices in the auction system; support the continuation of the production control program; adopt bylaws or regulations defining voting rights of the tobacco board of trade members; collect dues and initiation fees to cover the operating expenses of the tobacco board of trade; adopt regulations for the conduct of the tobacco market including the allocation of selling time and selling space.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 302, § 1.

248.020.
Sections not to be enforced until compacts entered into. [Repealed.]

248.025.
Membership of boards — Eligibility — Participation.

The membership of each tobacco board of trade shall be divided into two (2) classes: active members and associate members. Any person, partnership, corporation or association operating a loose leaf auction warehouse or warehouses shall be eligible for active membership in the tobacco board of trade; provided, however, that each board of trade shall have the right to establish the basis of voting rights for its warehouse members according to floor space, ownership, number of separate warehouse buildings or otherwise. Any person, partnership, corporation or association not eligible for active membership but holding a tobacco dealer’s license and purchasing tobacco pursuant to said license upon the market governed by the tobacco board of trade shall be eligible for election as an associate member. Each associate member shall have the option of becoming, upon written notice to the tobacco board of trade, either a participating or a nonparticipating member. A nonparticipating member shall not have the right to vote upon any question coming before the tobacco board of trade.

A participating associate member shall not participate in or have any voice or vote in the management, conduct, activities, allotments of sale time or hours, affixing of dates for the opening or closing of the tobacco markets serviced by the tobacco board of trade, or in any other manner or respect relating strictly to the functions normally performed by the warehouse members of the tobacco board of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 152, § 129.

248.030.
Districts. [Repealed.]

248.035.
Membership required to operate warehouse or purchase tobacco therein.

Every tobacco warehouse offering tobacco for sale at auction shall be a member of its local tobacco board of trade, and membership in good standing shall be deemed to be a reasonable requirement by such tobacco board of trade as a condition precedent to participating in the business of operating a tobacco warehouse or the purchase of tobacco at auction therein.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 152, § 130.

248.040.
Commission; selection of members. [Repealed.]

248.050.
Filling of vacancies on commission. [Repealed.]

248.060.
Compensation of commission. [Repealed.]

248.070.
Functions of commission. [Repealed.]

248.080.
County tobacco committee; selection of members. [Repealed.]

248.090.
Compensation of county tobacco committee. [Repealed.]

248.100.
Commission to assist county tobacco committee. [Repealed.]

248.110.
Functions of county tobacco committee. [Repealed.]

248.120.
Commission to issue marketing certificates and resale certificates. [Repealed.]

248.130.
Unlawful sales and processing without certificates. [Repealed.]

248.140.
Dealer not to resell or condition tobacco without resale certificates. [Repealed.]

248.150.
State may enter into compacts with other states. [Repealed.]

248.160.
Suspension of quota sections. [Repealed.]

248.170.
Form of interstate compacts. [Repealed.]

248.180.
Determinations of state quotas by state commissions. [Repealed.]

248.190.
Cooperation with commissions of other states. [Repealed.]

248.200.
Establishment of farm acreage and marketing quotas. [Repealed.]

248.210.
Harvesting excess acreage prohibited. [Repealed.]

248.220.
Commission funds; expenditure; purpose. [Repealed.]

248.230.
Persons to furnish information to commission. [Repealed.]

248.240.
Circuit courts may enjoin violations. [Repealed.]

248.250.
Commissioner to grade, inspect and label. [Repealed.]

248.260.
Purchaser to pay for grading. [Repealed.]

248.270.
Seller to tell grade to buyer. [Repealed.]

248.280.
Storage warehouseman to grade and weigh tobacco — Receipts.

Any person engaged in the business of warehouseman for the purpose of receiving, grading, handling, prizing and storing tobacco, shall, upon the receipt of tobacco, have competent persons to grade it into distinct and proper grades and weigh it. He shall give a warehouse receipt for the tobacco to the owner or consignor, setting forth each grade and the number of pounds.

After complying with subsection (1) the warehouseman may commingle all tobacco so received into like grades and types.

History.

4814a-1, 4814a-4.

248.290.
Warehouse license — Fees.

Each warehouse shall pay to the department an annual license fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125). A license fee shall be paid on each warehouse building operated as a place of sale for tobacco, regardless of the number of such buildings owned by any individual, corporation, firm, or other type of management organization. It shall be paid on July 1 of each year.

The one hundred twenty-five dollar ($125) fee per license collected by the department shall be used by the department to carry out its functions under KRS

248.290

to

248.440

. All fines collected for violations of the provisions of KRS

248.350

shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving account to be used in the enforcement of KRS

248.350

.

History.

4814c-16: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 133; 1978, ch. 270, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 183, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Home Tobacco Warehouse Company, which owns four separate warehouses, clearly would be required under the terms of this section to pay a separate license fee of $250 for each warehouse building regardless of the fact that the company owns all four (4) buildings, and regardless of the fact that there may only be one general office, provided, of course, that tobacco is sold at each separate warehouse, but if some tobacco warehouse buildings are used solely for storing tobacco no license would be required for such buildings.

OAG 78-438

.

When the word “building” is strictly construed as in the context of a licensing statute, it does not embrace parts or segments of a building or structure.

OAG 78-438

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Warehouses and warehouseman, KRS ch. 359.

Warehouses subject to legislative control, Ky. Const., § 206.

248.300.
Department to supervise warehouses — Inspectors and employees.

The department shall administer KRS

248.290

to

248.440

, and shall have general supervision over the sale of tobacco in warehouses throughout the state.

The Commissioner shall employ such inspectors and other employees as are necessary for the enforcement of KRS

248.290

to

248.440

, and fix the duties and compensation of those employees.

History.

4814c-14: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 270, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 183, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

248.310.
Duties and powers of inspectors.

The inspectors employed under KRS

248.300

shall carry out a general inspection service of all warehouses and shall strictly enforce KRS

248.280

to

248.440

.

An inspector employed by the department may:

Reweigh any reasonable amount of tobacco that has been received by the tobacco warehouse.

Determine the weight of all containers and devices used in the transport for the purpose of weighing tobacco on the warehouse floor and establish a weight tare for each warehouse.

History.

4814c-15: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 9, § 16; 1964, ch. 108; 1978, ch. 270, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 183, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An inspector’s reasons for requiring the reweighing of any tobacco should be made known to the warehouseman or his agent in charge.

OAG 63-1077

.

Although an inspector would not have to have absolute knowledge or proof of improper weight, his reason for reweighing must be based upon a fact or evidence known to him that the tobacco has been improperly weighed.

OAG 63-1077

.

In view of the fact that tobacco warehouses are public warehouses and in view of legislation which grants the department of agriculture power to license, supervise and regulate such warehouses, agents of the department are authorized to examine the records of tobacco warehouses.

OAG 76-175

.

248.320.
Auctions to be free and open.

All sales of leaf tobacco at public auction shall be free and open to all responsible bidders.

History.

4812.

248.330.
Combination to control or interfere with bidding prohibited.

No persons shall combine, by any rule, bylaw or otherwise, for the purpose of controlling, or in any way interfering with the free and unrestricted right to bid on or purchase leaf tobacco offered for sale at public auction at any warehouse or place of sale where tobacco is sold by warehousemen for others in this state.

History.

4810.

248.340.
Preventing persons from bidding or purchasing prohibited.

No organization or corporation under the laws of this state shall prohibit any of its members or others from bidding on or purchasing leaf tobacco at any warehouse.

History.

4811.

248.350.
Discrimination prohibited.

No warehouse or warehouseman or person acting on behalf of any warehouse or warehouseman shall discriminate against any grower of tobacco in any way, including but not limited to, the sale, transportation, or handling of tobacco. All tobacco growers shall be entitled to the exact same considerations as all other tobacco growers serviced by the same warehouse, except that a warehouseman may distinguish among different types of packaging in setting the fee or commission.

Nothing in this section shall permit a warehouseman to discriminate in any way among growers marketing tobacco in the same kind of package.

No tobacco warehouseman selling leaf tobacco in this state shall discriminate between purchasers as to charges, samples, warranty or otherwise, whether the purchasers are members of the tobacco exchange or not.

History.

4813, 4814c-10: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 270, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

248.353.
Enforcement by Attorney General.

Compliance with the provisions of KRS

248.350

shall be monitored by the department with enforcement assistance provided by the Special Prosecutions Unit of the Office of the Attorney General.

The Attorney General at the request of the commissioner:

May make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as he deems necessary to determine if any person has violated or is about to violate KRS

248.350

or any administrative regulation or order thereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of KRS

248.350

or in the prescribing of administrative regulations and forms thereunder;

May require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the Attorney General may determine, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated; and

May publish information concerning any violation of KRS 248.350 or any administrative regulation or order thereunder.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under KRS

248.350

, the Attorney General or any officer designated by him may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the Attorney General deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, any court of competent jurisdiction, upon application by the Attorney General, may issue to that person an order requiring him to appear before the Attorney General, or the officer designated by him, there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question; and any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

No person is excused from attending and testifying or from producing any document or record before the Attorney General, or in obedience to the subpoena of the Attorney General or any officer designated by him, or in any proceeding instituted by the Attorney General, on the ground that the testimony or evidence (documentary or otherwise) required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture; but no individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after claiming his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence (documentary or otherwise), except that the individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 270, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 183, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

248.355.
Class action suit — Damages, computation and distribution.

The Attorney General shall be authorized to file a class action suit on behalf of all persons discriminated against in violation of KRS

248.350

and may recover monetary damages against any warehouse found to be in violation.

Damages shall be computed so as to equate the value of services or other considerations received by all growers of tobacco serviced by the warehouse found to be in violation.

Damages recovered pursuant to this section shall be distributed as follows:

Payment of court costs and all fees incidental to the litigation;

Payment of the expenses incurred by the Office of the Attorney General;

Payment of the balance to the aggrieved tobacco growers based on the poundage serviced at that warehouse found to be in violation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 270, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

248.360.
Rebates, special privileges and services by warehouses prohibited. [Repealed.]

248.370.
Maximum basket sales per hour — Hours and days of operation.

The maximum sales of baskets of tobacco on warehouse floors shall not exceed three hundred and sixty (360) baskets during any one (1) hour, nor shall the rate of sales exceed three hundred and sixty (360) baskets per hour.

The operating day at every warehouse shall be limited to five (5) actual selling hours and the operating week of every warehouse shall be limited to five (5) actual selling days.

History.

4814c-8.

248.380.
Sales of vocational education tobacco.

In addition to the days allowed for sales under KRS

248.370

each warehouse may operate one (1) Saturday during each season for the sale of tobacco grown by persons under twenty-one (21) years of age under a vocational education program sponsored by county agents or other county, state or federal agencies.

KRS

248.440

shall not apply to such sales.

History.

4814c-9.

248.390.
Maximum height and weight of baskets of tobacco. [Repealed.]

248.391.
Height and weight requirements for baskets of tobacco.

The Commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations establishing the height and weight requirements of a basket of tobacco when placed on a warehouse floor for the purpose of sale. In establishing the requirements, the Commissioner shall consider traditional height and weight standards for baskets of tobacco, and shall consider experimental marketing standards that may be applied from time to time.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

248.400.
Commingling of tobacco without grower’s consent prohibited.

No person shall commingle crops of tobacco on the warehouse floor while that tobacco is still the property of the grower, unless express permission for the commingling is obtained from the grower.

History.

4814c-11.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Storage warehousemen may commingle tobacco, when, KRS

248.280

.

248.410.
Weighmen must be bonded.

Warehouses shall submit to the department a list of the names of all weighmen employed. Each weighman so listed shall furnish a bond in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500) to the department for the faithful performance of his duty. Should any weighman knowingly and willfully, for the purpose of misleading the public, misrepresent or attempt to misrepresent the weight of any tobacco weighed by him on the warehouse floor, his bond shall be forfeited and the proceeds of it paid into the State Treasury.

No person other than a bonded weighman shall be permitted to weigh tobacco for the purpose of sale at any tobacco warehouse.

History.

4814c-5, 4814c-6.

248.420.
Inducement of false report by weighman prohibited.

No warehouseman shall attempt by any means to influence a weighman to report falsely the weight of any tobacco sold on the floor of his warehouse.

History.

4814c-18.

248.430.
Notice of sales and producers to be posted — False notice prohibited.

Any person who receives or undertakes to receive or take care of leaf tobacco for sale at public auction, whether with or without compensation, shall post or cause to be posted, a notice in a conspicuous place upon his premises, stating the number of pounds in the aggregate, actually sold, and the average price per pound received on account of each day’s sale. He shall post the notice not later than 9:00 a.m. on the day following the sale. He shall also, not less than thirty (30) minutes prior to such a sale, post at a point in the office of his warehouse, convenient and accessible for public inspection, a typewritten or printed list showing the true name and post office address of the owner and producer and the number of pounds of tobacco of each person whose tobacco will that day be offered for sale in the warehouse. No tobacco shall be delivered to or received by any warehouse for sale at public auction, unless the true names and post office addresses of the producer and owner of the tobacco are furnished the warehouse by the person delivering the tobacco. He shall also post on the outside of the scale house and in the farmer’s waiting room, if such places are in the warehouse, a schedule setting forth the rates of all commissions, fees, discounts and deductions.

No person shall, in the notice required by subsection (1), falsify the actual number of pounds sold or the average price of the tobacco sold, or falsely list the name, post office address or number of pounds of tobacco of any producer or owner whose tobacco will that day be offered for sale, or furnish a false name or address of the owner or producer to any warehouse.

History.

4814b-1, 4814b-2, 4814b-4: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 30.

248.440.
Daily reports to be furnished by warehouses and released by department.

Each warehouse shall submit, under regulations of the Commissioner, a daily system of sworn statements to include the total number of pounds of tobacco sold, the total amount paid for that tobacco and the average for the day for the particular warehouse reporting.

The department shall obtain the statements daily and release to the press a collaboration of the state average for the day and the average for each respective marketing center.

History.

4814c-13.

248.450.
Equipment used for transporting tobacco during weighing operation to be of uniform weight — Copy of section to be posted in scale office.

In each tobacco warehouse, redryer, prize room, or company, all pieces of each type of equipment used for transporting baskets of tobacco during a weighing operation in which the quantity value of the tobacco in the basket is determined shall be of uniform weight. In any case where the equipment being used for that purpose is not the property of the warehouse, redryer, prize room, or company in which the weighing operation is taking place, the weighman shall use the same tare as that set by the Division of Regulation and Inspection. In every weighing operation involving the same basket, the basket tare shall be the same as that originally determined by the Division of Regulation and Inspection.

Every tobacco warehouse, redryer, prize room, or company weighing tobacco for commercial purposes shall post a copy of this law in a conspicuous place in the scale office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 56, §§ 1, 2, effective May 18, 1956; 2002, ch. 49, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

248.460.
Liability of warehouseman for destruction of or damage to tobacco in storage.

As used in this section:

“Tobacco storage warehouseman” shall mean a person who is engaged in the business of long term storage of tobacco in a storage warehouse or related facility;

“Owner” shall mean a person who has contracted or agreed with a tobacco storage warehouseman for the long term storage of tobacco;

“Long term storage” and “tobacco in storage” shall mean the storage of redried tobacco, expressly excluding tobacco owned by a grower being held or stored in an auction warehouse by a warehouseman for the purpose of sale;

“Grower” means a person who is a producer of tobacco, either by himself or by tenant, sharecropper or hired person;

“Auction warehouse” means any tobacco warehouse operating as a place of sale for tobacco;

“Warehouseman” means a person who is the owner, operator, manager, lessee or proprietor of a warehouse engaged in selling tobacco or his agents or employees;

“Person” means any legal entity.

A tobacco storage warehouseman shall be liable to the owner for damages to or destruction of tobacco in storage due to the negligence of the tobacco storage warehouseman, his agents or employees. Evidence that the owner delivered tobacco to the tobacco storage warehouseman and that the tobacco was damaged or destroyed while stored with or in the care and custody of the tobacco storage warehouseman shall not be sufficient to create a presumption of negligence on the part of the tobacco storage warehouseman, or a prima facie case in favor of the owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 270, § 8, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Presumptions and burden of proof or of evidence where goods stored in situation governed by Uniform Warehouse Receipts Act are stolen, or are damaged or lost by fire or water. 13 A.L.R.2d 681.

Statute of limitations governing damage action against warehouseman for loss of or damage to stored goods. 23 A.L.R.2d 1466.

Damages recoverable from warehouseman for negligence causing injury to, or destruction of, goods of a perishable nature. 32 A.L.R.2d 910.

Warehouseman’s liability for injury to or destruction of stored goods from floods, heavy rains, or the like. 60 A.L.R.2d 1097.

Liability of warehouseman for injury to stored goods as result of failure to maintain proper temperature. 92 A.L.R.2d 1298.

Sufficiency of warehouseman’s precautions to protect goods against fire. 42 A.L.R.3d 908.

Bailee’s liability as affected by bailment condition that bailor procure insurance. 83 A.L.R.3d 519.

Liability of warehouseman or other bailee for loss of goods stored at other than agreed-upon place, 76 A.L.R.4th 883.

248.470.
Deduction from sales of tobacco for tobacco labor fund — Use of tobacco labor fund — Refund — Fine. [Repealed.]

248.480.
Kentucky Tobacco Settlement Trust Corporation — Board of directors — Duties — Amnesty compensation program — Liability. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 221, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 173, § 1, effective March 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XX, § 1, effective April 25, 2006; repealed by 2021 ch. 12, § 12, effective March 12, 2021.